California statutes. Corporations Code
(q) Any unincorporated interindemnity or reciprocal or interinsurance contract, that qualifies under the provisions of Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code, between members of a cooperative corporation, organized and operating under Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3 of Title 1, and whose members consist only of physicians and surgeons licensed in California, which contracts indemnify solely in respect to medical malpractice claims against the members, and which do not collect in advance of loss any moneys other than contributions by each member to a collective reserve trust fund or for necessary expenses of administration.

(1) Whenever it appears to the
 commissioner that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code, the commissioner may, in the commissioner’s discretion, bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California in the superior court to enjoin the acts or practices or to enforce compliance with Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code. Upon a proper showing a permanent or preliminary injunction, a restraining order, or a writ of mandate shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets.

(2) The commissioner may, in the commissioner’s discretion, (A) make public or private investigations within or outside of this state as the commissioner deems necessary to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate any provision of Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code or to aid in the enforcement of
 Section 1280.7, and (B) publish information concerning the violation of Section 1280.7.

(3) For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this section, the commissioner or any officer designated by the commissioner may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the commissioner deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

(4) In case of contumacy by, or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to, any person, the superior court, upon application by the commissioner, may issue to the person an order requiring the person to appear before the commissioner, or the officer designated by the commissioner, to produce documentary evidence, if so ordered, or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation
 or in question. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt.

(5) No person is excused from attending or testifying or from producing any document or record before the commissioner or in obedience to the subpoena of the commissioner or any officer designated by the commissioner, or in any proceeding instituted by the commissioner, on the ground that the testimony or evidence (documentary or otherwise), required of the person may tend to incriminate the person or subject the person to a penalty or forfeiture, but no individual may be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which the person is compelled, after validly claiming the privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence (documentary or otherwise), except that the individual testifying is not exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury or contempt
 committed in testifying.

(6) The cost of any review, examination, audit, or investigation made by the commissioner under Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code shall be paid to the commissioner by the person subject to the review, examination, audit, or investigation, and the commissioner may maintain an action for the recovery of these costs in any court of competent jurisdiction. In determining the cost, the commissioner may use the actual amount of the salary or other compensation paid to the persons making the review, examination, audit, or investigation plus the actual amount of expenses including overhead reasonably incurred in the performance of the work.

The recoverable cost of each review, examination, audit, or investigation made by the commissioner under Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), except that costs exceeding twenty-five
 thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be recoverable if the costs are necessary to prevent a violation of any provision of Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code.

(r) (1) Any
 shares, memberships, or credits to a member’s capital issued to a shareholder or member by any corporation organized and existing pursuant to the provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3 of Title 1, provided the aggregate investment in the corporation of
 that shareholder or member in shares, memberships, or credits to that member’s capital sold pursuant to this subdivision does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) The one-thousand-dollar ($1,000)
 limitation in paragraph (1) does not apply to any shares, memberships, or credits to that member’s capital as all, or part of, any patronage distributions, as defined in Section 12244.

(3) The exemption in paragraph (1) does not apply to any of the following:

(A) The shares, memberships, or capital credits of that corporation if any promoter thereof expects or intends to make a profit directly or indirectly from any business or activity associated with the corporation or the operation of the corporation or from remuneration, other than reasonable salary, received from the corporation.

(B) The nonvoting shares, memberships, or capital credits of that corporation issued to any person who does not possess, and who will not acquire in connection with the issuance of nonvoting shares, memberships, or capital credits,
 “voting power” in the corporation as defined in Section 12253.

(C) Shares, memberships, or capital credits issued by a nonprofit cooperative corporation organized to facilitate the creation of an unincorporated interindemnity arrangement that provides indemnification for medical malpractice to its physician and surgeon members, as set forth in subdivision (q).

(s) Any security consisting of or representing an interest in a pool of mortgage loans that meets each of the following requirements:

(1) The pool consists of whole mortgage loans or participation interests in those loans, which loans were originated or acquired in the ordinary course of business by a national bank or federal savings association or federal savings bank having its principal office in this state, by a bank incorporated
 under the laws of this state, or by a savings association as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 5102 of the Financial Code and which is subject to the supervision and regulation of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, and each of which at the time of transfer to the pool is an authorized investment for the originating or acquiring institution.

(2) The pool of mortgage loans is held in trust by a trustee which is a financial institution specified in paragraph (1) as trustee or otherwise.

(3) The loans are serviced by a financial institution specified in paragraph (1).

(4) The security is
 not offered in amounts of less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in the aggregate to any one purchaser.

(5) The security is offered pursuant to a registration under the Securities Act of 1933 (Public Law 112-106), as amended, or pursuant to an exemption under Regulation A under that act, or in the opinion of counsel for the issuer, is offered pursuant to an exemption under Section 4(a)(2) of that act.

(t) (1) Any security issued or guaranteed by and representing an interest in or a direct obligation of an industrial bank incorporated under the laws of the state and authorized by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation to
 engage in industrial banking business.

(2) Any investment certificate in or issued by any industrial bank that is organized under the laws of a state of the United States other than this state, that is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, and that maintains a branch office in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 512, Sec. 1.   (AB 283)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25100.1.

The following securities are not subject to Sections 25110, 25120, and 25130:

(a) A security defined as a “covered security” pursuant to Section 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 77r).

(b) A security issued by an investment company that is registered or that has filed a registration statement under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1) and that is defined as a “covered security” pursuant to Section 18(b)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, and all the following requirements are met:

(1) Prior to any offer or sale in this state, there is filed with or paid to the commissioner each of the following:

(A) A notice consisting of all documents that are part of a federal registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933 or, in lieu thereof, a form prescribed by the commissioner, and that a consent to service of process is either on file with the commissioner or is attached to the notice.

(B) As necessary to compute fees, a report of the value of securities covered under this subdivision that are offered or sold in this state.

(C) The notice filing fee provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 25608.1.

(2) If any offer or sale is to be made pursuant to Section 18(b)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933 and this subdivision more than 12 months after the date the notice was filed under this subdivision, the issuer shall file another notice and pay the fee specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25101.

The following securities are exempt from the provisions of Section 25130:

(a) Any security issued by a person that is the issuer of any security listed on a national securities exchange, if the exchange is certified by rule or order of the commissioner.

(b) The exemption provided by subdivision (a) does not apply to securities offered pursuant to a registration under the Securities Act of 1933 or pursuant to the exemption afforded by Regulation A under that act if the aggregate offering price of the securities offered pursuant to that exemption exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 131, Sec. 10.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25101.1.

The following securities are not subject to Sections 25110, 25120, and 25130:

(a) A security that is offered or sold in a transaction that is exempt from registration under Section 4(a)(1) or 4(a)(3) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. 77r et seq.) pursuant to Section 18(b)(4)(A) of that act, if the issuer, other than a foreign (other country) issuer described in subdivision (b), of the security files the required reports with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C.
 78a et seq.).

(b) A security of a foreign (other country) issuer that avails itself of the exemption from registration under Section 12(g)(3) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 is subject to the qualification requirements of Sections 25110, 25120, and 25130, unless the issuer is a reporting company under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and files the required reports under Section 13 or 15(d) of that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 516, Sec. 5.   (SB 363)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

25102.

The following transactions are exempted from the provisions of Section 25110:

(a) Any offer (but not a sale) not involving any public offering and the execution and delivery of any agreement for the sale of securities pursuant to the offer if (1) the agreement contains substantially the following provision: “The sale of the securities that are the subject of this agreement has not been qualified with the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation and the issuance of the securities or the payment or receipt of any part of the consideration therefor prior to the qualification is unlawful, unless the sale of securities is exempt from the qualification by Section 25100, 25102, or 25105 of the California Corporations Code. The rights of all parties to this agreement are expressly
 conditioned upon the qualification being obtained, unless the sale is so exempt;” and (2) no part of the purchase price is paid or received and none of the securities are issued until the sale of the securities is qualified under this law unless the sale of securities is exempt from the qualification by this section or Section 25100 or 25105.

(b) Any offer (but not a sale) of a security for which a registration statement has been filed under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, but has not yet become effective, or for which an offering statement under Regulation A has been filed but has not yet been qualified, if no stop order or refusal order is in effect and no public proceeding or examination looking towards an order is pending under Section 8 of the act and no order under Section 25140 or subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect under this law.

(c) Any offer (but not a
 sale) and the execution and delivery of any agreement for the sale of securities pursuant to the offer as may be permitted by the commissioner upon application. Any negotiating permit under this subdivision shall be conditioned to the effect that none of the securities may be issued and none of the consideration therefor may be received or accepted until the sale of the securities is qualified under this law.

(d) Any transaction or agreement between the issuer and an underwriter or among underwriters if the sale of the securities is qualified, or exempt from qualification, at the time of distribution thereof in this state, if any.

(e) Any offer or sale of any evidence of indebtedness, whether secured or unsecured, and any guarantee thereof, in a transaction not involving any public offering.

(f) Any offer or sale of
 any security in a transaction (other than an offer or sale to a pension or profit-sharing trust of the issuer) that meets each of the following criteria:

(1) Sales of the security are not made to more than 35 persons, including persons not in this state.

(2) All purchasers either have a preexisting personal or business relationship with the offeror or any of its partners, officers, directors or controlling persons, or managers (as appointed or elected by the members) if the offeror is a limited liability company, or by reason of their business or financial experience or the business or financial experience of their professional advisers who are unaffiliated with and who are not compensated by the issuer or any affiliate or selling agent of the issuer, directly or indirectly, could be reasonably assumed to have the capacity to protect their own interests in connection with the
 transaction.

(3) Each purchaser represents that the purchaser is purchasing for the purchaser’s own account (or a trust account if the purchaser is a trustee) and not with a view to or for sale in connection with any distribution of the security.

(4) The offer and sale of the security is not accomplished by the publication of any advertisement. The number of purchasers referred to above is exclusive of any described in subdivision (i), any officer, director, or affiliate of the issuer, or manager (as appointed or elected by the members) if the issuer is a limited liability company, and any other purchaser who the commissioner designates by rule. For purposes of this section, spouses (together with any custodian or trustee acting for the account of their minor children) are counted as one person and a partnership, corporation, or other organization that was not specifically formed
 for the purpose of purchasing the security offered in reliance upon this exemption, is counted as one person. The commissioner shall by rule require the issuer to file a notice of transactions under this subdivision.

The failure to file the notice or the failure to file the notice within the time specified by the rule of the commissioner shall not affect the availability of the exemption. Any issuer that fails to file the notice as provided by rule of the commissioner shall, within 15 business days after discovery of the failure to file the notice or after demand by the commissioner, whichever occurs first, file the notice and pay to the commissioner a fee equal to the fee payable had the transaction been qualified under Section 25110. Neither the filing of the notice nor the failure by the commissioner to comment thereon precludes the commissioner from taking any action that the commissioner deems necessary or appropriate under this division with respect to the
 offer and sale of the securities.

(g) Any offer or sale of conditional sale agreements, equipment trust certificates, or certificates of interest or participation therein or partial assignments thereof, covering the purchase of railroad rolling stock or equipment or the purchase of motor vehicles, aircraft, or parts thereof, in a transaction not involving any public offering.

(h) Any offer or sale of voting common stock by a corporation incorporated in any state if, immediately after the proposed sale and issuance, there will be only one class of stock of the corporation outstanding that is owned beneficially by no more than 35 persons, provided all of the following requirements have been met:

(1) The offer and sale of the stock is not accompanied by the publication of any advertisement, and no selling expenses have
 been given, paid, or incurred in connection therewith.

(2) The consideration to be received by the issuer for the stock to be issued consists of any of the following:

(A) Only assets (which may include cash) of an existing business enterprise transferred to the issuer upon its initial organization, of which all of the persons who are to receive the stock to be issued pursuant to this exemption were owners during, and the enterprise was operated for, a period of not less than one year immediately preceding the proposed issuance, and the ownership of the enterprise immediately prior to the proposed issuance was in the same proportions as the shares of stock are to be issued.

(B) Only cash or cancellation of indebtedness for money borrowed, or both, upon the initial organization of the issuer, provided all of the stock
 is issued for the same price per share.

(C) Only cash, provided the sale is approved in writing by each of the existing shareholders and the purchaser or purchasers are existing shareholders.

(D) In a case where after the proposed issuance there will be only one owner of the stock of the issuer, only any legal consideration.

(3) No promotional consideration has been given, paid, or incurred in connection with the issuance. Promotional consideration means any consideration paid directly or indirectly to a person who, acting alone or in conjunction with one or more other persons, takes the initiative in founding and organizing the business or enterprise of an issuer for services rendered in connection with the founding or organizing.

(4) A notice in a
 form prescribed by rule of the commissioner, signed by an active member of the State Bar of California, is filed with or mailed for filing to the commissioner not later than 10 business days after receipt of consideration for the securities by the issuer. That notice shall contain an opinion of the member of the State Bar of California that the exemption provided by this subdivision is available for the offer and sale of the securities. The failure to file the notice as required by this subdivision and the rules of the commissioner shall not affect the availability of this exemption. An issuer who fails to file the notice within the time specified by this subdivision shall, within 15 business days after discovery of the failure to file the notice or after demand by the commissioner, whichever occurs first, file the notice and pay to the commissioner a fee equal to the fee payable had the transaction been qualified under Section 25110. The notice, except when filed on behalf of a California corporation, shall
 be accompanied by an irrevocable consent, in the form that the commissioner by rule prescribes, appointing the commissioner or the commissioner’s successor in office to be the issuer’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against it or its successor that arises under this law or any rule or order hereunder after the consent has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the issuer. An issuer on whose behalf a consent has been filed in connection with a previous qualification or exemption from qualification under this law (or application for a permit under any prior law if the application or notice under this law states that the consent is still effective) need not file another. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the commissioner, but it is not effective unless (A) the plaintiff, who may be the commissioner in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by the commissioner, forthwith sends
 notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at its last address on file with the commissioner, and (B) the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this section is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within the further time as the court allows.

(5) Each purchaser represents that the purchaser is purchasing for the purchaser’s own account, or a trust account if the purchaser is a trustee, and not with a view to or for sale in connection with any distribution of the stock.

For the purposes of this subdivision, all securities held by spouses, whether or not jointly, shall be considered to be owned by one person, and all securities held by a corporation that has issued stock pursuant to this exemption shall be considered to be held by the shareholders to whom it has issued the stock.

All stock issued by a corporation pursuant to this subdivision as it existed prior to the effective date of the amendments to this section made during the 1996 portion of the 1995–96 Regular Session that required the issuer to have stamped or printed prominently on the face of the stock certificate a legend in a form prescribed by rule of the commissioner restricting transfer of the stock in a manner provided for by that rule shall not be subject to the transfer restriction legend requirement and, by operation of law, the corporation is authorized to remove that transfer restriction legend from the certificates of those shares of stock issued by the corporation pursuant to this subdivision as it existed prior to the effective date of the amendments to this section made during the 1996 portion of the 1995–96 Regular Session.

(i) Any offer or sale (1) to a bank, savings and loan association, trust company,
 insurance company, investment company registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, pension or profit-sharing trust (other than a pension or profit-sharing trust of the issuer, a self-employed individual retirement plan, or individual retirement account), or other institutional investor or governmental agency or instrumentality that the commissioner may designate by rule, whether the purchaser is acting for itself or as trustee, or (2) to any corporation with outstanding securities registered under Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or any wholly owned subsidiary of the corporation that after the offer and sale will own directly or indirectly 100 percent of the outstanding capital stock of the issuer, provided the purchaser represents that it is purchasing for its own account (or for the trust account) for investment and not with a view to or for sale in connection with any distribution of the security.

(j) Any
 offer or sale of any certificate of interest or participation in an oil or gas title or lease (including subsurface gas storage and payments out of production) if either of the following apply:

(1) All of the purchasers meet one of the following requirements:

(A) Are and have been during the preceding two years engaged primarily in the business of drilling for, producing, or refining oil or gas (or whose corporate predecessor, in the case of a corporation, has been so engaged).

(B) Are persons described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (i).

(C) Have been found by the commissioner upon written application to be substantially engaged in the business of drilling for, producing, or refining oil or gas so as not to require the protection provided by this law
 (which finding shall be effective until rescinded).

(2) The security is concurrently hypothecated to a bank in the ordinary course of business to secure a loan made by the bank, provided that each purchaser represents that it is purchasing for its own account for investment and not with a view to or for sale in connection with any distribution of the security.

(k) Any offer or sale of any security under, or pursuant to, a plan of reorganization under Chapter 11 of the federal bankruptcy law that has been confirmed or is subject to confirmation by the decree or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(l) Any offer or sale of an option, warrant, put, call, or straddle, and any guarantee of any of these securities, by a person who is not the issuer of the security subject to the right, if the transaction, had
 it involved an offer or sale of the security subject to the right by the person, would not have violated Section 25110 or 25130.

(m) Any offer or sale of a stock to a pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or employee stock ownership plan, provided that (1) the plan meets the requirements for qualification under Section 401 of the Internal Revenue Code, and (2) the employees are not required or permitted individually to make any contributions to the plan. The exemption provided by this subdivision shall not be affected by whether the stock is contributed to the plan, purchased from the issuer with contributions by the issuer or an affiliate of the issuer, or purchased from the issuer with funds borrowed from the issuer, an affiliate of the issuer, or any other lender.

(n) Any offer or sale of any security in a transaction, other than an offer or sale of a security in a rollup
 transaction, that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The issuer is (A) a California corporation or foreign corporation that, at the time of the filing of the notice required under this subdivision, is subject to Section 2115, or (B) any other form of business entity, including without limitation a partnership or trust organized under the laws of this state. The exemption provided by this subdivision is not available to a “blind pool” issuer, as that term is defined by the commissioner, or to an investment company subject to the federal Investment Company Act of 1940.

(2) Sales of securities are made only to qualified purchasers or other persons the issuer reasonably believes, after reasonable inquiry, to be qualified purchasers. A corporation, partnership, or other organization specifically formed for the purpose of acquiring the securities offered by the issuer in reliance
 upon this exemption may be a qualified purchaser if each of the equity owners of the corporation, partnership, or other organization is a qualified purchaser. Qualified purchasers include the following:

(A) A person designated in Section 260.102.13 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) A person designated in subdivision (i) or any rule of the commissioner adopted thereunder.

(C) A pension or profit-sharing trust of the issuer, a self-employed individual retirement plan, or an individual retirement account, if the investment decisions made on behalf of the trust, plan, or account are made solely by persons who are qualified purchasers.

(D) An organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, corporation,
 Massachusetts or similar business trust, or partnership, each with total assets in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) according to its most recent audited financial statements.

(E) With respect to the offer and sale of one class of voting common stock of an issuer or of preferred stock of an issuer entitling the holder thereof to at least the same voting rights as the issuer’s one class of voting common stock, provided that the issuer has only one-class voting common stock outstanding upon consummation of the offer and sale, a natural person who, either individually or jointly with the person’s spouse, (i) has a minimum net worth of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) and had, during the immediately preceding tax year, gross income in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and reasonably expects gross income in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) during the current tax year or (ii) has a minimum net
 worth of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). “Net worth” shall be determined exclusive of home, home furnishings, and automobiles. Other assets included in the computation of net worth may be valued at fair market value.

Each natural person specified above, by reason of that person’s business or financial experience, or the business or financial experience of that person’s professional adviser, who is unaffiliated with and who is not compensated, directly or indirectly, by the issuer or any affiliate or selling agent of the issuer, can be reasonably assumed to have the capacity to protect that person’s interests in connection with the transaction. The amount of the investment of each natural person shall not exceed 10 percent of the net worth, as determined by this subparagraph, of that natural person.

(F) Any other purchaser designated as qualified by rule of the commissioner.

(3) Each purchaser represents that the purchaser is purchasing for the purchaser’s own account (or trust account, if the purchaser is a trustee) and not with a view to or for sale in connection with a distribution of the security.

(4) Each natural person purchaser, including a corporation, partnership, or other organization specifically formed by natural persons for the purpose of acquiring the securities offered by the issuer, receives, at least five business days before securities are sold to, or a commitment to purchase is accepted from, the purchaser, a written offering disclosure statement that shall meet the disclosure requirements of Regulation D (17 C.F.R. 230.501 et seq.), and any other information as may be prescribed by rule of the commissioner, provided that the issuer shall not be obligated pursuant to this paragraph to provide this disclosure statement to a natural
 person qualified under Section 260.102.13 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations. The offer or sale of securities pursuant to a disclosure statement required by this paragraph that is in violation of Section 25401, or that fails to meet the disclosure requirements of Regulation D (17 C.F.R. 230.501 et seq.), shall not render unavailable to the issuer the claim of an exemption from Section 25110 afforded by this subdivision. This paragraph does not impose, directly or indirectly, any additional disclosure obligation with respect to any other exemption from qualification available under any other provision of this section.

(5) (A) A general announcement of proposed offering may be published by written document only, provided that the general announcement of proposed offering sets forth the following required information:

(i) The name of the issuer of
 the securities.

(ii) The full title of the security to be issued.

(iii) The anticipated suitability standards for prospective purchasers.

(iv) A statement that (I) no money or other consideration is being solicited or will be accepted, (II) an indication of interest made by a prospective purchaser involves no obligation or commitment of any kind, and, if the issuer is required by paragraph (4) to deliver a disclosure statement to prospective purchasers, (III) no sales will be made or commitment to purchase accepted until five business days after delivery of a disclosure statement and subscription information to the prospective purchaser in accordance with the requirements of this subdivision.

(v) Any other information required by rule of the
 commissioner.

(vi) The following legend: “For more complete information about (Name of Issuer) and (Full Title of Security), send for additional information from (Name and Address) by sending this coupon or calling (Telephone Number).”

(B) The general announcement of proposed offering referred to in subparagraph (A) may also set forth the following information:

(i) A brief description of the business of the issuer.

(ii) The geographic location of the issuer and its business.

(iii) The price of the security to be issued, or, if the price is not known, the method of its determination or the probable price range as specified by the issuer, and the aggregate offering price.

(C) The general announcement of proposed offering shall contain only the information that is set forth in this paragraph.

(D) Dissemination of the general announcement of proposed offering to persons who are not qualified purchasers, without more, shall not disqualify the issuer from claiming the exemption under this subdivision.

(6) No telephone solicitation shall be permitted until the issuer has determined that the prospective purchaser to be solicited is a qualified purchaser.

(7) The issuer files a notice of transaction under this subdivision both (A) concurrent with the publication of a general announcement of proposed offering or at the time of the initial offer of the securities, whichever occurs first, accompanied by a filing fee, and (B) within
 10 business days following the close or abandonment of the offering, but in no case more than 210 days from the date of filing the first notice. The first notice of transaction under subparagraph (A) shall contain an undertaking, in a form acceptable to the commissioner, to deliver any disclosure statement required by paragraph (4) to be delivered to prospective purchasers, and any supplement thereto, to the commissioner within 10 days of the commissioner’s request for the information. The exemption from qualification afforded by this subdivision is unavailable if an issuer fails to file the first notice required under subparagraph (A) or to pay the filing fee. The commissioner has the authority to assess an administrative penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) against an issuer that fails to deliver the disclosure statement required to be delivered to the commissioner upon the commissioner’s request within the time period set forth above. Neither the filing of the disclosure statement nor the
 failure by the commissioner to comment thereon precludes the commissioner from taking any action deemed necessary or appropriate under this division with respect to the offer and sale of the securities.

(o) An offer or sale of any security issued by a corporation or limited liability company pursuant to a purchase plan or agreement, or issued pursuant to an option plan or agreement, where the security at the time of issuance or grant is exempt from registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to Rule 701 adopted pursuant to that act (17 C.F.R. 230.701), the provisions of which are hereby incorporated by reference into this section, provided that (1) the terms of any purchase plan or agreement shall comply with Sections 260.140.42, 260.140.45, and 260.140.46 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, (2) the terms of any option plan or agreement shall comply with Sections 260.140.41, 260.140.45, and 260.140.46 of
 Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, and (3) the issuer files a notice of transaction in accordance with rules adopted by the commissioner no later than 30 days after the initial issuance of any security under that plan, accompanied by a filing fee as prescribed by subdivision (y) of Section 25608. The failure to file the notice of transaction within the time specified in this subdivision shall not affect the availability of this exemption. An issuer that fails to file the notice shall, within 15 business days after discovery of the failure to file the notice or after demand by the commissioner, whichever occurs first, file the notice and pay the commissioner a fee equal to the maximum aggregate fee payable had the transaction been qualified under Section 25110.

Offers and sales exempt pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed to be part of a single, discrete offering and are not subject to integration with any other offering or sale, whether qualified
 under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25110), or otherwise exempt, or not subject to qualification.

(p) An offer or sale of nonredeemable securities to accredited investors (Section 28031) by a person licensed under the Capital Access Company Law (Division 3 (commencing with Section 28000) of Title 4), provided that all purchasers either (1) have a preexisting personal or business relationship with the offeror or any of its partners, officers, directors, controlling persons, or managers (as appointed or elected by the members), or (2) by reason of their business or financial experience or the business or financial experience of their professional advisers who are unaffiliated with and who are not compensated by the issuer or any affiliate or selling agent of the issuer, directly or indirectly, could be reasonably assumed to have the capacity to protect their own interests in connection with the transaction. All nonredeemable securities shall
 be evidenced by certificates that shall have stamped or printed prominently on their face a legend in a form to be prescribed by rule or order of the commissioner restricting transfer of the securities in the manner as the rule or order provides. The exemption under this subdivision shall not be available for any offering that is exempt or asserted to be exempt pursuant to Section 3(a)(11) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 77c(a)(11)) or Rule 147 (17 C.F.R. 230.147) thereunder or otherwise is conducted by means of any form of general solicitation or general advertising.

(q) Any offer or sale of any viatical or life settlement contract or fractionalized or pooled interest therein in a transaction that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Sales of securities described in this subdivision are made only to qualified purchasers or other persons the issuer reasonably
 believes, after reasonable inquiry, to be qualified purchasers. A corporation, partnership, or other organization specifically formed for the purpose of acquiring the securities offered by the issuer in reliance upon this exemption may be a qualified purchaser only if each of the equity owners of the corporation, partnership, or other organization is a qualified purchaser. Qualified purchasers include the following:

(A) A person designated in Section 260.102.13 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) A person designated in subdivision (i) or any rule of the commissioner adopted thereunder.
